Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1095
Order for delivery; contents.

The order for the delivery of the property to the plaintiff shall be addressed and delivered to the sheriff. It shall state the names of the parties, the court in which the action is brought, and command the sheriff to take the property, describing it, and deliver it to the plaintiff, and to make return of the order on a day to be named therein.

R.S.1867, Code § 183, p. 422;

R.S.1913, § 7824;

C.S.1922, § 8768;

C.S.1929, § 20-1095;

R.S.1943, § 25-1095.

Where writ is made returnable on holiday or Sunday, succeeding day is return day. Ostertag v. Galbraith, 23 Neb. 730, 37 N.W. 637 (1888).